Florida, session 2026, SB1624.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âParagraphs (a) and (d) of subsection (1) of 15 section 784.048, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 16 784.048âStalking; definitions; penalties.â 17 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 18 (a)ââHarassâ means to engage in a course of conduct 19 directed at a specific person, whether such person is 20 specifically named or described in sufficient detail as to be 21 clearly identifiable, which causes substantial emotional 22 distress to that person and serves no legitimate purpose. 23 (d)ââCyberstalkâ means: 24 1.âTo engage in a course of conduct to communicate, or to 25 cause to be communicated, directly or indirectly, words, images, 26 or language by or through the use of electronic mail or 27 electronic communication, directed at or pertaining to a 28 specific person, whether such person is specifically named or 29 described in sufficient detail as to be clearly identifiable; or 30 2.âTo access, or attempt to access, the online accounts or 31 Internet-connected home electronic systems of another person 32 without that personâs permission, 33 34 causing substantial emotional distress to that person and 35 serving no legitimate purpose. 36 Section 2.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 37 made by this act to section 784.048, Florida Statutes, in a 38 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 784.0493, Florida 39 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 40 784.0493âHarassment or intimidation based on religious or 41 ethnic heritage.â 42 (1)âAs used in this section, the terms âcredible threatâ 43 and âharassâ have the same meaning as in s. 784.048(1). 44 Section 3.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 45 made by this act to section 784.048, Florida Statutes, in a 46 reference thereto, paragraph (e) of subsection (3) of section 47 1006.147, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 48 1006.147âBullying and harassment prohibited.â 49 (3)âFor purposes of this section: 50 (e)âDefinitions in s. 815.03 and the definition in s. 51 784.048(1)(d) relating to stalking are applicable to this 52 section. 53 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.